Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 10
SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS

30-10-1001 to 30-10-1011. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire part repealed, p. 582, § 1, effective March 19.

Editor's note:

This part 10 was numbered as article 10 of chapter 35, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 10 prior to its repeal in 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.